Utah statutes.
78A-7-117.   Judgment not a lien unless so recorded.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (3), a judgment rendered in a justice
court does not create a lien upon any real property of the judgment debtor
unless the judgment or abstract of the judgment:
(a)  is recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which
the real property of the judgment debtor is located; and
(b)  contains the information identifying the judgment debtor as referred to
in Subsection 78B-5-201(4) either:
(i)  in the judgment or abstract of judgment; or
(ii)  as a separate information statement of the judgment creditor as referred
to in Subsection 78B-5-201(5).
(2) The lien runs for eight years from the date the judgment was entered in
the district court under Section 78B-5-202 unless the judgment is earlier
satisfied.
(3)  State agencies are exempt from the recording requirement of Subsection
(1).
